Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.230

Application for licensing.

An applicant for licensing as a commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative shall file with the administrator or the designee of the administrator an application for licensing together with a consent to service of process pursuant to RCW 21.30.190. The application for licensing must contain the information that the administrator determines, by rule, is necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of this chapter.

[ 1986 c 14 s 24.]